Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 3

Misappropriation of State-Shared Funds

9-3-301. Misappropriation of state-shared funds by counties — Withholding of funds — Bond.

In the event that any county official, department, commission or other agency of any county, misappropriates any funds paid to the county from state-shared revenues to the extent that such is in violation of any state law, the comptroller of the treasury, upon determination by a certified audit that such a misappropriation has occurred, shall certify the same to the commissioner of finance and administration.

Upon such certification, the commissioner shall withhold, or cause to be withheld, from state-shared revenues from all other agencies, commissions, departments, or officials of the county, a sum equal to the ratio of the amount misappropriated during the fiscal year to all the state-shared revenues payable to all agencies or departments of the county during the fiscal year, as applied to the amount of state-shared revenues, the individual agency or department was due from state-shared revenues during the fiscal year.

Any county official vested by law with the authority to administer state-shared funds shall furnish a good and sufficient bond in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or in a greater sum as the county legislative body may determine, payable to the state, to indemnify the county against the loss of any funds occurring as a result of such person's unlawful or dishonest acts. The bond shall be prepared in accordance with title 8, chapter 19, approved by the county legislative body, recorded in the office of the county register of deeds and transmitted to the office of the county clerk for safekeeping.

Acts 1972, ch. 835, § 1; 1977, ch. 270, § 15; T.C.A., §§ 9-316, 9-3-201; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8; 1998, ch. 677, § 13; 2013, ch. 315, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 315, § 31 provided that the act, which amended subsection (c), shall apply to the renewal or obtaining an official bond for any bonding after April 29, 2013.

9-3-302. Funds may be withheld in year subsequent — Amount equal to amount misappropriated.

The commissioner of finance and administration may withhold such funds as specified in §9-3-301 from distribution to the county during the fiscal year immediately subsequent to the year the misappropriation took place. Upon such certification, the commissioner may withhold or cause to be withheld, from state-shared revenues distributed to the county, for use by a particular agency or department in which the misappropriation occurred, a sum equal to the amount misappropriated.

Acts 1972, ch. 835, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 9-317, 9-3-202; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8.

9-3-303. Right to appeal the determination of comptroller of the treasury.

Any county or county official aggrieved by the determination of the comptroller of the treasury may appeal such decision to the chancery court of the county where the misappropriation occurred.

Acts 1972, ch. 835, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 9-318, 9-3-203; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 8.